src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON JOOKSMA     ! only jooksma

                      :%{W%} IMPERS ;         ! impersonal forms joostakse, ... 
             +Use/Rare: IMPERS ;              ! impersonal forms jookstakse,...
                      : SUPINE_V ;            ! jooksma
                      :%{W%} INFINITIVE ;     ! joosta, joostes 
             +Use/Rare: INFINITIVE ;          ! jooksta, jookstes
                      : IMPERATIVE ;          ! jooksku
             +Use/Rare:%{W%} IMPERATIVE ;     ! joosku
                      : NU ;                  ! jooksnud
                      :%>I7S7 IND_PAST ;      ! jooksis, jooksin
                      :e IND_COND_PRS ;       ! jookseb

LEXICON KATMA      ! VVS 35   katma kütma matma võtma jätma
                   ! almost like SAATMA, but IMPERS are even weaker grade

                      :t C_COMMON ;          ! kütta
                      :%{W%} IMPERS ;        ! köetud
          +Use/NotNorm:te%{W%} IMPERS ;      ! kütetud  (võiks olla ka ilma {W}-ta, s.t. :e IMPERS;)
                      :t SUPINE_V ;          ! kütma
                      :t%>I7S7 IND_PAST ;    ! küttis
                      :a IND_COND_PRS ;      ! kütab

LEXICON LASKMA    ! only laskma

                      : C_COMMON ;            ! lasta, lasku, lasknud
                      : IMPERS ;              ! impersonal forms lastakse, ...
                      : SUPINE_V ;            ! laskma
             +Use/Rare:%>I7S7 IND_PAST ;      ! indicative past laskis, ...
                      :%{W%}%>I7S7 IND_PAST ; ! indicative past lasi, ...
                      :e%{W%} IND_COND_PRS ;  ! laseb

LEXICON NAASMA     ! only naasma, koolma; norm like NAERMA (tõusma), but usage moving towards ELAMA

                    :E7 NAERMA ;            ! naasma, naasis, naastud, ...
        +Use/NotNorm:e IMPERS ;             ! naasetud
        +Use/NotNorm:e SUPINE_V ;           ! naasema
        +Use/NotNorm:e INFINITIVE ;         ! naaseda
        +Use/NotNorm:e IMPERATIVE ;         ! naasegu
        +Use/NotNorm:e NU ;                 ! naasenud
        +Use/NotNorm:e%>I7S7 IND_PAST ;     ! naases

LEXICON VEENMA     ! only veenma, möönma; norm like NAERMA , but usage moving towards HAKKAMA

                    :A7 NAERMA ;            ! veenma, veenis, veendud, ...
        +Use/NotNorm:a IMPERS ;             ! veenatud
        +Use/NotNorm:a SUPINE_V ;           ! veenama
        +Use/NotNorm:a INFINITIVE ;         ! veenata
        +Use/NotNorm:a IMPERATIVE ;         ! veenaku
        +Use/NotNorm:a NU ;                 ! veenanud
        +Use/NotNorm:a%>I7S7 IND_PAST ;     ! veenas


LEXICON C_COMMON  ! common to almost all words of types 32-35 (supine stem ends with C)

                      : INFINITIVE ;        ! naerda, seista, sööta, nutta, kütta
                      : IMPERATIVE ;        ! naergu, seisku, söötku, nutku, kütku
                      : NU ;                ! kütnud


! ---------------
LEXICON TULEMA     ! only tulema, panema, surema

                      :%{dbl%}%> A_INFINITIVE ;       ! surra
                      :%{dbl%} IMPERS_A ;        ! surrakse, surdud
                      :e SUPINE_V ;          ! surema
                      :%{W%} IMPERATIVE ;    ! surgu
                      :%{W%} NU ;            ! surnud
                      :%>I7 IND_PAST ;       ! suri, surin, ...
                      :e%{W%} IND_COND_PRS ; ! sureb

LEXICON OLEMA    ! only olema 

                      :ol%{dbl%}%> A_INFINITIVE ;       ! olla
                      :ol%{dbl%} IMPERS_A ;       ! ollakse, oldud
                      :ole SUPINE_V ;         ! olema
                      :ol%{W%} IMPERATIVE ;   ! olgu
                      :ol%{W%} NU ;           ! olnud
                      :ol%>I7 IND_PAST ;      ! oli, olin, ...
             +Pers+Prs:ole%{W%}%> CONDITIONAL ;
   @R.Part.One@@P.Part.Bad@ OLEMA2 ;

LEXICON OLEMA2
   +Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2:ole%> GI ;
     +Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg:ole%> GI ;
         +Pers+Prs+Ind:ole SG1 ;
         +Pers+Prs+Ind:ole SG2 ;
 +Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff:on GI ;
         +Pers+Prs+Ind:ole PL1 ;
         +Pers+Prs+Ind:ole PL2 ;
 +Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff:on GI ;

! + negative forms...
     +Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg:pole%> GI ;        ! NB! it has the same categories as ole ...
+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Neg:pole%>ksin GI ;
+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Neg:pole%>ksid GI ;
    +Pers+Prs+Cond+Neg:pole%>ks GI ;
+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Neg:pole%>ksime GI ;
+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Neg:pole%>ksite GI ;
+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Neg:pole%>ksid GI ;
    +Pers+Prs+Quot+Neg:pole%>vat GI ;
     +Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg:pol%>nud GI ;
+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Neg:pol%>nuksin GI ;
+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Neg:pol%>nuksid GI ;
    +Pers+Prt+Cond+Neg:pol%>nuks GI ;
+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Neg:pol%>nuksime GI ;
+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Neg:pol%>nuksite GI ;
+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Neg:pol%>nuksid GI ;
    +Pers+Prt+Quot+Neg:pol%>nuvat GI ;
   +Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg:pol%>da GI ;  
  +Impers+Prs+Cond+Neg:pol%>daks GI ;
  +Impers+Prs+Quot+Neg:pol%>davat GI ;
   +Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg:pol%>dud GI ;
  +Impers+Prt+Cond+Neg:pol%>duks GI ;     ! almost non-attested form (by Google search) ... 

LEXICON MINEMA    ! only minema 

                      :min%{dbl%}%> A_INFINITIVE ;       ! minna
                      :min%{dbl%} IMPERS_A ;     ! minnakse, mindud
                      :mine SUPINE_V ;           ! minema
                      :min%{W%} IMPERATIVE ;     ! mingu
                      :läi%{W%} NU ;             ! läinud
                      :läk%>s IND_PAST ;         ! läks, läksin etc
             +Pers+Prs:lähe%{W%} IND_PRS ;       ! lähen, läheb, ...
             +Pers+Prs:lähe%{W%}%> CONDITIONAL ;  ! läheks, ...
   @R.Part.One@@P.Part.Bad@ MINEMA2 ;

LEXICON MINEMA2
   +Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2:mine%{W%}%> GI ;          ! mine
+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff+Use/Rare:läh%{W%}%>me GI ;  ! lähme more colloquial...

! ---------------
! 17 exceptional words of types 37, 38, all ending in VV

LEXICON KEEMA   ! VVS 37   laama, keema, leema, naima, võima, näima

                      : VV_COMMON ;
                      : INFINITIVE ;        ! keeda
                      : IMPERS_DA ;          ! keedakse, keedud
                      :%>I7S7 IND_PAST ;    ! kees

LEXICON SAAMA !!= @CODE@ is a lexicon for saama-type words. ! VVS 37   saama, jääma

                      : VV_COMMON ;
                      : INFINITIVE ;        ! saada
                      : IMPERS_DA ;          ! saadakse, saadud
                      :%>I7 IND_PAST ;      ! sai

LEXICON VIIMA     ! VVS 38   viima, käima, pooma, müüma

                      : VV_COMMON ;
                      :%> A_INFINITIVE ;     ! viia
                      : IMPERS_A ;           ! viiakse, viidud
                      :%>I7S7 IND_PAST ;     ! viis

LEXICON TOOMA     ! VVS 38   jooma, looma, tooma, lööma, sööma

                      : VV_COMMON ;
                      :%> A_INFINITIVE ;     ! surra, süüa
                      : IMPERS_A ;           ! juuakse, joodud
                      :%>I7 IND_PAST ;       ! jõi
 
LEXICON VV_COMMON  ! common to all 17 words of types 37, 38 (supine stem ends with VV)

                      : SUPINE_V ;            ! keema, saama etc
                      :%{W%} IMPERATIVE ;     ! keegu, saagu etc
                      :%{W%} NU ;             ! keenud, saanud etc
                      :%{W%} IND_COND_PRS ;   ! keeb, saab etc

LEXICON IMPERS_A     ! if infinitive affix is -a, then ...
 @R.Part.One@@P.Part.Bad@ IMPERS_A_COMP ;
                      :»d TAV_DERIVATION ;       ! söödav, söödavalt, ... 
                      :»d TAMATU_DERIVATION ;    ! söödamatu 
                      :»d TU_DERIVATION ;        ! söödu, söödult, sööduim, ... 

LEXICON IMPERS_A_COMP    ! impersonal forms 
                      :%>d IMPERS_DUD ;        ! surdud, söödud
                      :%{W%}%> IMPERS_AKSE ;   ! surrakse, süüakse
        +Use/NotNorm:%>d IMPERS_AKSE ;       ! surdakse, söödakse
