src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON SimpleVerbs
aset=võtma+V:aset=v˘õT1 KATMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
ellu=viima+V:˘ellu=v˘ii VIIMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
familiaarne=olema+V:famili˘aarne= OLEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
hinda=minema+V:h˘inda= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
hinge=matma+V:h˘inge=m˘aT1 KATMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
ilmale=tulema+V:ilmale=tul TULEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
jagu=saama+V:jagu=s˘aa SAAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
jutule=võtma+V:jutule=v˘õT1 KATMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
jõus=olema+V:j˘õus= OLEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
jäässe=minema+V:j˘äässe= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kaasa=lööma+V:k˘aasa=l˘Ö6Ö6 TOOMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kapakut=laskma+V:kapakut=l˘asK1 LASKMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
karjas=käima+V:karjas=k˘äi VIIMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kasutütreks=võtma+V:kasu%#t˘ütreks=v˘õT1 KATMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
katki=jääma+V:k˘atʲki=j˘ää SAAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
keema+V:k˘ee KEEMA  "weight: 8 " ; 
kehtima=panema+V:k˘ehtima=pan TULEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kiiremaks=minema+V:k˘iiremaks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kohane=olema+V:kohane= OLEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kohkvele=lööma+V:k˘ohkvele=l˘Ö6Ö6 TOOMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kohut=käima+V:kohut=k˘äi VIIMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kokku=jooksma+V:k˘okku=j˘ooK1s JOOKSMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuulsaks=saama+V:k˘uulsaks=s˘aa SAAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kõrgemaks=minema+V:k˘õrgemaks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kükakil=olema+V:kükakil= OLEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
külge=lööma+V:k˘ülʲge=l˘Ö6Ö6 TOOMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
külla=tulema+V:k˘ülla=tul TULEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kütma+V:k˘üT1 KATMA  "weight: 7 " ; 
lahti=laskma+V:l˘ahti=l˘asK1 LASKMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
linale=tooma+V:linale=t˘O6O6 TOOMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
linkadi-lonkadi=käima+V:l˘inkadi-l˘onkadi=k˘äi VIIMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõdvemale=laskma+V:lõdvemale=l˘asK1 LASKMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
läbi=jooksma+V:läbi=j˘ooK1s JOOKSMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
läikima=lööma+V:l˘äikima=l˘Ö6Ö6 TOOMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
lüüa=saama+V:l˘üüa=s˘aa SAAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
mahedaks=minema+V:mahedaks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
marraskil=olema+V:marraskil= OLEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
mikski=panema+V:m˘ikski=pan TULEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
minema=jooksma+V:minema=j˘ooK1s JOOKSMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
minna=laskma+V:m˘inna=l˘asK1 LASKMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
möönma+V:m˘öön VEENMA  "weight: 7 " ; 
müüma+V:m˘üü VIIMA  "weight: 5 " ; 
naasma+V:n˘aas NAASMA  "weight: 7 " ; 
naima+V:n˘ai KEEMA  "weight: 10 " ; 
nõuks=võtma+V:n˘õuks=v˘õT1 KATMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
näima+V:n˘äi KEEMA  "weight: 5 " ; 
otsa=jooksma+V:˘otsa=j˘ooK1s JOOKSMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
otsa=saama+V:˘otsa=s˘aa SAAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
paanikas=olema+V:paanikas= OLEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
paigale=panema+V:paigale=pan TULEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
peeru=laskma+V:p˘eeru=l˘asK1 LASKMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
perekonda=looma+V:pˈerek˘onda=l˘O6O6 TOOMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
pimedamaks=minema+V:pimedamaks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
purju=panema+V:p˘urju=pan TULEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
põhja=laskma+V:p˘õhja=l˘asK1 LASKMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
põhja=viima+V:p˘õhja=v˘ii VIIMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
raha=saama+V:raha=s˘aa SAAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
ringi=jooksma+V:r˘ingi=j˘ooK1s JOOKSMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
sassis=olema+V:s˘asʲsis= OLEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
seisma=panema+V:s˘eisma=pan TULEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
selgida=laskma+V:s˘elʲgida=l˘asK1 LASKMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
sumedaks=minema+V:sumedaks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
suupistet=võtma+V:s˘uu%#pistet=v˘õT1 KATMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
sööma+V:s˘Ö6Ö6 TOOMA  "weight: 5 " ; 
tagasi=viima+V:tagasi=v˘ii VIIMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
tasaseks=jääma+V:tasaseks=j˘ää SAAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
tormi=jooksma+V:t˘ormi=j˘ooK1s JOOKSMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
tulema=tulema+V:tulema=tul TULEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
tuult=laskma+V:t˘uult=l˘asK1 LASKMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
uskuma=jääma+V:˘uskuma=j˘ää SAAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
vait=olema+V:v˘ait= OLEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
veenma+V:v˘een VEENMA  "weight: 7 " ; 
verd=jooksma+V:v˘erd=j˘ooK1s JOOKSMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
vinderdi-vänderdi=käima+V:vinderdi-vänderdi=k˘äi VIIMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
võima+V:v˘õi KEEMA  "weight: 3 " ; 
välja=võtma+V:v˘älʲja=v˘õT1 KATMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
vääriti=minema+V:vääriti= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
ära=jooksma+V:ära=j˘ooK1s JOOKSMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
ära=tooma+V:ära=t˘O6O6 TOOMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
